src/fst/stems/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRON_MIKÄ

+Pl+Nom:tkä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Sg+Nom:kä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Sg+Abl:ltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ade:llä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+All:lle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ela:stä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ess:nä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Gen:nkä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_S ;

+Sg+Ill:hin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ill:nne	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Ine:ssä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Par:tä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;

+Sg+Tra:ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S ;


LEXICON PRON_MIKÄKIN

+Pl+Nom:tkäkin	# ;

+Sg+Nom:käkin	# ;

+Sg+Abl:ltäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ade:lläkin	# ;

+Sg+All:llekin	# ;

+Sg+Ela:stäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ess:näkin	# ;

+Sg+Gen:nkäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:hinkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:hinkäkin	# ;

+Sg+Ill:nnekin	# ;

+Sg+Ine:ssäkin	# ;

+Sg+Par:täkin	# ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikin	# ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikäkin	# ;


LEXICON PRON_MIKÄÄN

+Sg:kään	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

+Pl+Nom:tkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:ltään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:llään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:llekään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All+Dial/Finland:lleen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:stään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:nään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:nkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:hinkään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:ssään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:tään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par+Dial/Finland:ttään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikään	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_MINÄ

+Acc:nut	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:nu	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:nu	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:nu	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:nu	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;

:nä	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_MOLEMMAT

:ma	PRON_BACK_PLNOM_T ;

:m	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA_OPTPOSS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN_OPTPOSS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN_OPTPOSS ;

+Use/Marg:ma	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg+Use/Marg:ma	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

+Use/Marg:pa	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg+Use/Marg:pa	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_OPTPOSS ;

+Use/Marg:pa	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC ;

+Use/Marg:pa	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN_OPTPOSS ;

+Use/Marg:pa	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS ;

+Use/Marg:pi	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_MONES

+Sg:nne	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg:nne	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:ns	PRON_BACK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:ns	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA_OPTPOSS ;

:ns	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN_OPTPOSS ;

:ns	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_MONI

+Sg:e	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:e	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:e	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:i	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

+Sg+Err/Orth:e	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;
+Pl+Nom:e%>t PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON PRON_MONIAS

:a	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:a	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

:s	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;


LEXICON PRON_MONTA

:	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;


LEXICON PRON_MUU

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

:u	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:u	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:u	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

+Use/NG:u	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ;

+Use/NG+Sg:u	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;


LEXICON PRON_MUUAN

:n	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;


LEXICON PRON_MUUTAMA

:a	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:a	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC ;

:a	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;


LEXICON PRON_MÄ

+Abl:ult	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Acc:ut	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Ade:ull	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Ade:ul	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Ela:ust	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:u	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:u	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:u	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:u	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ;

:ä	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_MÄÄ

:	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_NE

:e	PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_0 ;

:i	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:i	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;

:i	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:i	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:i	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

:i	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;


LEXICON PRON_NOI

:	PRON_BACK_PLNOM_0 ;


LEXICON PRON_NUO

+Sg+Acc+Use/Arch:uot	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:o	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:o	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:o	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:o	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:o	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

:uo	PRON_BACK_PLNOM_0 ;


LEXICON PRON_NÄMÄ

:mä	PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_0 ;

+Sg+Acc+Use/Arch:mät	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom+Dial/Finland:ä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;

:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;


LEXICON PRON_SAMA

:a	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:a	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:o	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:o	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:o	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;

:o	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;


LEXICON PRON_SE

+Sg:e	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:e	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N ;

:ii	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN ;

+Use/NG:i	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ; ! exceptional forms listed above

:i	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

+Sg+Ela:iitä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:iinä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_TOI

:i	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ;


LEXICON PRON_TOINEN

:nen	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:se	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

:se	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg:se	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN_OPTPOSS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_TUO

:uo	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:uo	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

+Sg:uo	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:uo	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:uo	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ;


LEXICON PRON_TÄMÄ

+Sg:mä	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:mä	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N ;

+Sg+Gen+Dial/Finland:n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen+Dial/Finland:än	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom+Dial/Finland:ä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN ;


LEXICON PRON_USEA

:a	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:a	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:a	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

+Use/Arch:h	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;


LEXICON PRON_USEAMPI

:ma	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:ma	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:m	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;

+Sg:pa	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:pa	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:pa	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:pa	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;

:pi	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:p	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:p	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:p	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:p	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;


LEXICON PRON_USEIMMAT

:mma	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:mma	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:mm	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;

+Sg:mpa	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:mpa	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:mpa	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;

:mp	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:mp	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:mp	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:mp	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:n	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:n	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:n	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN ;

LEXICON PRONOUN
minä+Pron+Pers+Sg1:mi    PRON_MINÄ       ;
sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2:si    PRON_MINÄ       ;
ei-mikään+Pron:ei-mi  PRON_MIKÄÄN  ;
harva+Pron:harv  PRON_SAMA  ;
harvempi+Pron:harvem  PRON_USEAMPI  ;
ken+Pron:ken  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
kenkään+Pron:kenkään  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
mikä+Pron:mi  PRON_MIKÄ  ;
mikä+Pron:mi  PRON_MIKÄ  ;
mikä+Pron:mi  PRON_MIKÄ  ;
mikäkin+Pron:mi  PRON_MIKÄKIN  ;
mikään+Pron+Qnt:mi  PRON_MIKÄÄN  ; ! see above for mikään ! Above is commented out
molemmat+Pron:molem  PRON_MOLEMMAT  ;
mones+Pron:mone  PRON_MONES  ;
moni+Pron:mon  PRON_MONI  ;
monias+Pron:monia  PRON_MONIAS  ;
monta+Pron:monta  PRON_MONTA  ;
muu+Pron:mu  PRON_MUU  ;
muuan+Pron:muua  PRON_MUUAN  ;
muudan+Pron:muuda  PRON_MUUAN  ;
muutama+Pron:muutam  PRON_MUUTAMA  ;
mä+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m  PRON_MÄ  ;
mää+Pron:mää  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
ne+Pron:n  PRON_NE  ;
noi+Pron:noi  PRON_NOI  ;
nuo+Pron:n  PRON_NUO  ;
nämä+Pron:nä  PRON_NÄMÄ  ;
sama+Pron:sam  PRON_SAMA  ;
se+Pron:s  PRON_SE  ; 
sä+Pron+Pers+Sg2:s  PRON_MÄ  ;
sää+Pron:sää  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
toi+Pron:to  PRON_TOI  ;
toinen+Pron:toi  PRON_TOINEN  ;
toinen+Pron:toi  PRON_TOINEN  ;
tuo+Pron:t  PRON_TUO  ;
tämä+Pron:tä  PRON_TÄMÄ  ;
tää+Pron:tää  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
usea+Pron:use  PRON_USEA  ;
useampi+Pron:useam  PRON_USEAMPI  ;
useimmat+Pron:usei  PRON_USEIMMAT  ;
yks+Pron:yks  PRON_MÄÄ  ;
